District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.152

Exemption of government agencies from fees levied for Mayor as registered agent.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, ch. 269, § 152
as added Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 2(d), 31 DCR 195
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.152.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.51.